src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_RUGIZH ! rügiž:rügi
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:ž SG-NOM-SUF ;
:š SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:he SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:he PL-NOM-SUF ;
:he PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_VEDEKAZ ! vedekaz:vedeka
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:z SG-NOM-SUF ;
:s SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:ha SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:ha PL-NOM-SUF ;
:ha PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_MEZ1 ! mezʼ:me
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€ mezʼ: mezʼ+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ mehen: mezʼ+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ mehid: mezʼ+N+Pl+Par
:zʼ SG-NOM-SUF ;
:s SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:he SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:he PL-NOM-SUF ;
:he PL-ACC-SUF ;
:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_CHAI ! čai:ča
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€ čai: čai+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ čajun: čai+N+Sg+Gen
:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:ihe SG-OBLIQUE ;
!R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
!:he PL-NOM-SUF ;
!:he PL-ACC-SUF ;
!:h PL-OBLIQUE ;

!LEXICON N_KENGATOI ! kengätoi:kengäto
!!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
!:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
!:n SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
!:me SG-OBLIQUE ;
!R ; ! xxx check
!! Plural
!:me PL-NOM-SUF ;
!:me PL-ACC-SUF ;
!:m PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_AVADIM ! avadim:avadi
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:m SG-NOM-SUF ;
:n SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:me SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:me PL-NOM-SUF ;
:me PL-ACC-SUF ;
:m PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_im/men/in/mehe/mid ! ištim:išt
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  ištim: +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  ištmen: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  ištint: +N+Sg+Par
!!€  ištmid: +N+Pl+Par
:im SG-NOM-SUF ;
:in SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:me SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:me PL-NOM-SUF ;
:me PL-ACC-SUF ;
:m PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_LUMI ! lumi:lu
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:mi SG-NOM-SUF ;
:n SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:me SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:me PL-NOM-SUF ;
:me PL-ACC-SUF ;
:m PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_KONDI ! kondi:kond
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
:ja SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:ja PL-NOM-SUF ;
:ja PL-ACC-SUF ;
:j PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_TEGII ! tegii:tegi
 N_i/jan/jad/jaha/joid ;
LEXICON N_i/jan/jad/jaha/joid
! _i/jan/jad/jaha/joid
!Sg+Nom/Sg+Gen/Sg+Par/Sg+Ill/Pl+Par
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
:ja SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:ja PL-NOM-SUF ;
:ja PL-ACC-SUF ;
:jo PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_KACUI ! kacui:kacu
 N_i/jan/jad/jaha/jid ;
LEXICON N_i/jan/jad/jaha/jid
! _i/jan/jad/jaha/joid
!Sg+Nom/Sg+Gen/Sg+Par/Sg+Ill/Pl+Par
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  kacui: +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  kacujan: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  kacujid: +N+Pl+Par
:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
:ja SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:ja PL-NOM-SUF ;
:ja PL-ACC-SUF ;
:j PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_KEL1 !kel':kel
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:' SG-NOM-SUF ;
:' SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:%>e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>e PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_SAR1 !sarʼ:sar
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:ʼ SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:%>e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>e PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_JOUCEN !joucen:jouc%{eØ%}
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:%^RmVow%>e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%^RmVow%>e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%^RmVow%>e PL-ACC-SUF ;
:%^RmVow PL-OBLIQUE ;


LEXICON N_OIGED !oiged:oiged
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
!oi|ged (-ktan, -ktoid)
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
!^PEN^DEVOICE^RmVow^DEVOICE
:%^PEN%^DEVOICE%^RmVow%^DEVOICEa SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%^PEN%^DEVOICE%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>a PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%^PEN%^DEVOICE%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>a PL-ACC-SUF ;
:%^PEN%^DEVOICE%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>o PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_SAMAL !samal:samal syncope
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
:%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>o SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>o PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>o PL-ACC-SUF ;
:%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>o PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_PU ! pu:pu
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
 N_PU-SG ;
 N_PU-PL ;
LEXICON N_PU-SG
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-OBLIQUE ;
LEXICON N_PU-PL
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
: PL-NOM-SUF ;
: PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON	N_VIDENZ1 ! videnz':viden (-den, -t, -zid)
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:z' SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:de SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:de PL-NOM-SUF ;
:de PL-ACC-SUF ;
:nz PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_KODI !kodi:kodi
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
:%>i SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>i PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>i PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;


LEXICON N_NIMI !nimi:nim
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
!nimi
!nimen
!nimid
:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
:%>e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>e PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_SARV !sarv:sarv
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
: SG-NOM-SUF ;
:%>e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%>e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%>e PL-ACC-SUF ;
: PL-OBLIQUE ;


LEXICON N_CIPUINE ! cipuine:cipu
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
!:INE1 NMN_ ;
:ine SG-NOM-SUF ;
:š SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:iže SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:iže PL-NOM-SUF ;
:iže PL-ACC-SUF ;
:iž  PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_TOSHTMINE ! toštmine:toštmi
 N_ine/izhen/isht/izhehe/izhid ;
LEXICON N_ine/izhen/isht/izhehe/izhid
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:ne SG-NOM-SUF ;
:š SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:že SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:že PL-NOM-SUF ;
:že PL-ACC-SUF ;
:ž  PL-OBLIQUE ;

! noruz’:norud
LEXICON N_NORUZ1 ! OUN-ZD_QEQ
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
: NMN_NORUZ1 ;



LEXICON N_KEZI ! kezi:ked
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
: NMN_KEZI ;

! aluz:aluz
LEXICON N_ALUZ ! z s _QEQ
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
 SG-NOM-SUF ;
:%^DEVOICE%>e SG-ILL-SUF ;
:%^DEVOICE SG-PAR-SUF ;
:%^DEVOICE%>e SG-OBLIQUE_NO_DERIV/ILL/PAR ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:%^DEVOICEe PL-NOM-SUF ;
:%^DEVOICEe PL-ACC-SUF ;
:%^DEVOICE  PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_VEL1L1 ! velʼlʼ:vel
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  velʼlʼ: +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  vellen: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  vellid: +N+Pl+Par
:ʼlʼ SG-NOM-SUF ;
:le SG-ILL-SUF ;
:le SG-PAR-SUF ;
:le SG-OBLIQUE_NO_DERIV/ILL/PAR ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:le PL-NOM-SUF ;
:le PL-ACC-SUF ;
:l  PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_IN_TTE !mitte
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:tte SG-NOM-SUF ;
:čče SG-ILL-SUF ;
:ttuš SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:čče SG-OBLIQUE_NO_DERIV/ILL/PAR ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:čče PL-NOM-SUF ;
:čče PL-ACC-SUF ;
:čč  PL-OBLIQUE ;


LEXICON N_KESKUS ! keskus:keskus
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
 SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF ;
:e SG-OBLIQUE ;
R ; ! xxx check
! Plural
:e PL-NOM-SUF ;
:e PL-ACC-SUF ;
:  PL-OBLIQUE ;


LEXICON N_VEDÄI ! i j _QAQ1 Does this work like _muna_?
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:QAQ1 NMN_ ;

LEXICON N_VEPS 
!!€gt-norm:   Noun ' / '
!!€  : +N+Sg+Nom
!!€  n: +N+Sg+Gen
!!€  d: +N+Pl+Par
:QÄQ1 NMN_ ;

LEXICON N_NADO !!= @CODE@ nado:nado
 N_o/on/od/oho/oid ;
