src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
čai+N:ča N_CHAI ;
avtomobilizacii+N:avtomobilizaci N_TEGII ;
distancii+N:distanci N_TEGII ;
edahaine+N:edaha N_CIPUINE ;
edenoi+N:edeno N_KODI ;
emähändikaz+N:emä#händika N_VEDEKAZ ;
emämecoi+N:emä#meco N_KODI ;
ezimezʼ+N:ezime N_MEZ1 ;
farmakologii+N:farmakologi N_TEGII ;
garbol+N:gar#b%{oØ%}l N_SAMAL ;
habinod+N:habino N_PU-PL ;
hama+N:hama N_PU ;
hang+v1+N:hang N_SARV ;
hardjod+N:hardjo N_PU-PL ;
harjakod+N:harjako N_PU-PL ;
harjoituz+N:harjoituz N_ALUZ ;
heimolaine+N:heimola N_CIPUINE ;
heraštoitim+N:heraštoiti N_AVADIM ;
hirʼ+N:hir N_SAR1 ;
homen+N:hom%{eØ%}n N_JOUCEN ;
händikaz+N:händika N_VEDEKAZ ;
ikun+N:ik%{uØ%}n N_OIGED ;
ikunpöluz+N:ikun#pöluz N_ALUZ ;
imperii+N:imperi N_TEGII ;
ižoi+N:ižo N_KODI ;
jablokpu+N:jablok#pu N_PU ;
jogi+N:jog N_NIMI ;
jonoštim+N:jonošti N_AVADIM ;
joucen+N:jouc%{eØ%}n N_JOUCEN ;
joudai+N:jouda N_KONDI ;
jurʼ+N:jur N_SAR1 ;
jälʼg+v1+N:jälʼg N_SARV ;
jäpuraz+N:jä#pura N_VEDEKAZ ;
jüguzʼavto+N:jüguzʼ#avto N_PU ;
kalatez+N:kalatez N_ALUZ ;
kandonsenʼ+N:kandon#sen N_KEL1 ;
kategorii+N:kategori N_TEGII ;
kavi+N:kav N_NIMI ;
kelʼ+N:kelʼ N_KEL1 ;
kesk+N:kesk N_SARV ;
keskus+N:keskus N_KESKUS ;
kezi+N:ked N_KEZI ;
kirjištmezʼ+N:kirjišt#me N_MEZ1 ;
klei+N:kle N_KODI ;
kogo+N:kogo N_PU ;
kohenduz+N:kohenduz N_ALUZ ;
koirakaz+N:koiraka N_VEDEKAZ ;
kondi+N:kond N_KONDI ;
kondjakaz+N:kondjaka N_VEDEKAZ ;
konstrukcii+N:konstrukci N_TEGII ;
korʼ+N:kor N_SAR1 ;
kroikoi+N:kroiko N_KODI ;
kudmaine+N:kudma N_CIPUINE ;
kurg+v1+N:kurg N_SARV ;
kägi+N:käg N_NIMI ;
kämen+N:käm%{eØ%}n N_JOUCEN ;
kärbässenʼ+N:kärbäs#sen N_KEL1 ;
käzi+N:käd N_KEZI ;
lehtezmezʼ+N:lehtez#me N_MEZ1 ;
lendim+N:lendi N_AVADIM ;
lepsenʼ+N:lep#sen N_KEL1 ;
lezi+N:led N_KEZI ;
lidnaneläi+N:lidnan#elä N_KONDI ;
likutim+N:likuti N_AVADIM ;
lipkaine+N:lipka N_CIPUINE ;
lodo+N:lodo N_PU ;
longoitez+N:longoitez N_ALUZ ;
lumi+N:lu N_LUMI ;
lämoi+N:lämo N_KODI ;
löudmine+N:löudmi N_TOSHTMINE ;
mecjärv+N:mec#järv N_SARV ;
meri+N:mer N_NIMI ;
mezʼ+N:me N_MEZ1 ;
muigištandsubstancii+N:muigištandsubstanci N_TEGII ;
murahaine+N:muraha N_CIPUINE ;
muru+N:muru N_PU ;
muzei+N:muze N_KONDI ;
nado+N:nado N_NADO ;
negloikaz+N:negloika N_VEDEKAZ ;
nemʼ+N:nem N_SAR1 ;
nimi+N:nim N_NIMI ;
noruzʼ+N:norud N_NORUZ1 ;
ogakaz+N:ogaka N_VEDEKAZ ;
ongitez+N:ongitez N_ALUZ ;
ostai+N:osta N_KONDI ;
paimen+N:paim%{eØ%}n N_JOUCEN ;
paltin+N:palt%{iØ%}n N_OIGED ;
patrakod+N:patrako N_PU-PL ;
pidatim+N:pidati N_AVADIM ;
pirdim+N:pirdi N_AVADIM ;
pismäine+v1+N:priha N_CIPUINE ;
poigantütar+N:poigan#tüt%{aØ%}r N_OIGED ;
politikanmezʼ+N:politian#me N_MEZ1 ;
polʼ+N:pol N_KEL1 ;
punolendim+N:puno#lendi N_AVADIM ;
päivituz+N:päivituz N_ALUZ ;
päivkodi+N:päiv#kod N_KODI ;
pämezʼ+N:pä#me N_MEZ1 ;
pöudhirʼ+N:pöud#hir N_SAR1 ;
pöudtedaimezʼ+N:pöud#tedai#me N_MEZ1 ;
pü+N:pü N_PU ;
rahvahanlugemine+N:rahvahanlugemi N_TOSHTMINE ;
rahvahanpartii+N:rahvahanparti N_TEGII ;
rahvaz+N:rahva N_VEDEKAZ ;
redumajag+v1+N:redu#majag N_SARV ;
regi+N:reg N_NIMI ;
rippui+N:rippu N_KONDI ;
rujod+N:rujo N_PU-PL ;
rügiž+N:rügi N_RUGIZH ;
samal+N:sam%{aØ%}l N_SAMAL ;
sapug+N:sap%{uØ%}g N_OIGED ;
sarʼ+N:sar N_SAR1 ;
satatez+N:satatez N_ALUZ ;
seikh+v1+N:seikh N_SARV ;
seižui+N:seižu N_KONDI ;
selʼgaivod+N:selʼg#aivo N_PU-PL ;
senʼ+N:sen N_KEL1 ;
sinikod+N:siniko N_PU-PL ;
sonʼ+N:son N_KEL1 ;
suvi+N:suv N_NIMI ;
särg+v1+N:särg N_SARV ;
südäivezi+N:südäi#ved N_KEZI ;
sügüzʼku+N:sügüzʼ#ku N_PU ;
tagaine+N:taga N_CIPUINE ;
teraz+N:teraz N_ALUZ ;
tervehtim+N:tervehti N_AVADIM ;
tohʼ+N:toh N_SAR1 ;
tomʼ+N:tom N_SAR1 ;
tora-kinokomedii+N:tora-kinokomedi N_TEGII ;
torakukoi+N:tora#kuko N_KODI ;
toštmine+N:toštmi N_TOSHTMINE ;
tožnarg+v1+N:tožnarg N_SARV ;
tuličud+N:tuliču N_PU-PL ;
tulleitamine+N:tulleitami N_TOSHTMINE ;
tütrentütar+N:tütren#tüt%{aØ%}r N_OIGED ;
tüvi+N:tüv N_NIMI ;
umbezjurʼ+N:umbez#jur N_SAR1 ;
upotai+N:upota N_KONDI ;
valdkundkelʼ+N:vald#kund#kel N_KEL1 ;
varapämezʼ+N:vara#pä#me N_MEZ1 ;
varu+N:varu N_PU ;
vedehine+N:vedehi N_TOSHTMINE ;
vedekaz+N:vedeka N_VEDEKAZ ;
vedäi+N:vedäi N_VEDÄI ;
veps+N:veps N_VEPS ;
verialaine+N:veriala N_CIPUINE ;
vezi+N:ved N_KEZI ;
viri+N:vir N_KODI ;
vozʼ+N:vod N_NORUZ1 ;
vägi+N:väg N_NIMI ;
vägimezʼ+N:vägi#me N_MEZ1 ;
zerkol+N:zerk%{oØ%}l N_SAMAL ;
änetai+N:äneta N_KONDI ;
änʼ+N:än N_KEL1 ;
čirikod+N:čiriko N_PU-PL ;
čokim+N:čoki N_AVADIM ;
